North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 3. Notarial Acts, Powers, and Limitations.

§ 10B-20.
Powers and limitations.

A notary may perform any of the following notarial acts:

Acknowledgments.

Oaths and affirmations.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-59, s. 6, effective October 1, 2006, and except as otherwise set forth in the act, applicable to notarial acts performed on or after October 1, 2006.

Verifications or proofs.

A notarial act shall be attested by all of the following:

The signature of the notary, exactly as shown on the notary’s commission.

The legible appearance of the notary’s name exactly as shown on the notary’s commission. The legible appearance of the name may be ascertained from the notary’s typed or printed name near the notary’s signature or from elsewhere in the notarial certificate or from the notary’s seal if the name is legible.

The clear and legible appearance of the notary’s stamp or seal.

A statement of the date the notary’s commission expires. The statement of the date that the notary’s commission expires may appear in the notary’s stamp or seal or elsewhere in the notarial certificate.

A notary shall not perform a notarial act if any of the following apply:

The principal or subscribing witness is not in the notary’s presence at the time the notarial act is performed. However, nothing in this Chapter shall require a notary to complete the notarial certificate attesting to the notarial act in the presence of the principal or subscribing witness.

The principal or subscribing witness is not personally known to the notary or identified by the notary through satisfactory evidence.

(2a)

The credible witness is not personally known to the notary.

, (4) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-59, s. 8, effective October 1, 2006, and except as otherwise set forth in the act, applicable to notarial acts performed on or after October 1, 2006.

(5)

The notary is a signer of, party to, or beneficiary of the record, that is to be notarized. However, a disqualification under this subdivision shall not apply to a notary who is named in a record solely as (i) the trustee in a deed of trust, (ii) the drafter of the record, (iii) the person to whom a registered document should be mailed or sent after recording, or (iv) the attorney for a party to the record, so long as the notary is not also a party to the record individually or in some other representative or fiduciary capacity. A notary who is an employee of a party shall not be disqualified under this subdivision solely because of the notary’s employment by a party to the record or solely because the notary owns stock in a party to the record.

(6)

The notary will receive directly from a transaction connected with the notarial act any commission, fee, advantage, right, title, interest, cash, property, or other consideration exceeding in value the fees specified in

G.S. 10B-31

, other than fees or other consideration paid for services rendered by a licensed attorney, a licensed real estate broker or salesperson, a motor vehicle dealer, or a banker.

A notary may certify the affixation of a signature by mark on a record presented for notarization if:

The mark is affixed in the presence of the notary;

The notary writes below the mark: “Mark affixed by (name of signer by mark) in presence of undersigned notary”; and

The notary notarizes the signature by performing an acknowledgment, oath or affirmation, jurat, or verification or proof.

If a principal is physically unable to sign or make a mark on a record presented for notarization, that principal may designate another person as his or her designee, who shall be a disinterested party, to sign on the principal’s behalf pursuant to the following procedure:

The principal directs the designee to sign the record in the presence of the notary and two witnesses unaffected by the record;

The designee signs the principal’s name in the presence of the principal, the notary, and the two witnesses;

Both witnesses sign their own names to the record near the principal’s signature;

The notary writes below the principal’s signature: “Signature affixed by designee in the presence of (names and addresses of principal and witnesses)”; and

The notary notarizes the signature through an acknowledgment, oath or affirmation, jurat, or verification or proof.

A notarial act performed in another jurisdiction in compliance with the laws of that jurisdiction is valid to the same extent as if it had been performed by a notary commissioned under this Chapter if the notarial act is performed by a notary public of that jurisdiction or by any person authorized to perform notarial acts in that jurisdiction under the laws of that jurisdiction, the laws of this State, or federal law.

Persons authorized by federal law or regulation to perform notarial acts may perform the acts for persons serving in or with the Armed Forces of the United States, their spouses, and their dependents.

The Secretary and register of deeds in the county in which a notary qualified may certify to the commission of the notary.

A notary public who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this State who advertises the person’s services as a notary public in a language other than English, by radio, television, signs, pamphlets, newspapers, other written communication, or in any other manner, shall post or otherwise include with the advertisement the notice set forth in this subsection in English and in the language used for the advertisement. The notice shall be of conspicuous size, if in writing, and shall state: “I AM NOT AN ATTORNEY LICENSED TO PRACTICE LAW IN THE STATE OF NORTH CAROLINA, AND I MAY NOT GIVE LEGAL ADVICE OR ACCEPT FEES FOR LEGAL ADVICE.” If the advertisement is by radio or television, the statement may be modified but must include substantially the same message.

A notary public who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this State is prohibited from representing or advertising that the notary public is an “immigration consultant” or expert on immigration matters unless the notary public is an accredited representative of an organization recognized by the Board of Immigration Appeals pursuant to Title 8, Part 292, section 2(a-e) of the Code of Federal Regulations (8 C.F.R. § 292.2(a-e)).

A notary public who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this State is prohibited from rendering any service that constitutes the unauthorized practice of law. A nonattorney notary shall not assist another person in drafting, completing, selecting, or understanding a record or transaction requiring a notarial act.

A notary public required to comply with the provisions of subsection (i) of this section shall prominently post at the notary public’s place of business a schedule of fees established by law, which a notary public may charge. The fee schedule shall be written in English and in the non-English language in which the notary services were solicited and shall contain the notice required in subsection (i) of this section, unless the notice is otherwise prominently posted at the notary public’s place of business.

If notarial certificate wording is not provided or indicated for a record, a notary who is not also a licensed attorney shall not determine the type of notarial act or certificate to be used. This does not prohibit a notary from offering the selection of certificate forms recognized in this Chapter or as otherwise authorized by law.

A notary shall not claim to have powers, qualifications, rights, or privileges that the office of notary does not provide, including the power to counsel on immigration matters.

Before signing a notarial certificate and except as provided in this subsection, a notary shall cross out or mark through all blank lines or spaces in the certificate. However:

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a notary shall not be required to complete, cross out, or mark through blank lines or spaces in the notary certificate form provided for in

G.S. 47-43

indicating when and where a power of attorney is recorded if that recording information is not known to the notary at the time the notary completes and signs the certificate;

A notary’s failure to cross out or mark through blank lines or spaces in a notarial certificate shall not affect the sufficiency, validity, or enforceability of the certificate or the related record; and

A notary’s failure to cross out or mark through blank lines or spaces in a notarial certificate shall not be grounds for a register of deeds to refuse to accept a record for registration.

History.

1866, c. 30; 1879, c. 128; Code, s. 3307; Rev., ss. 2350, 2351a, 2352; C.S., ss. 3175, 3177, 3179; 1951, c. 1006, s. 1; 1953, c. 836; 1961, c. 733; 1967, c. 24, s. 22; c. 984; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1977, c. 375, s. 5; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1998-228, s. 5; 2001-450, s. 2; 2001-487, s. 121; 2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, ss. 6-12; 2006-199, s. 1; 2011-183, s. 7; 2013-204, s. 1.1.

§ 10B-21.
Notaries ex officio.

The clerks of the superior court may act as notaries public in their several counties by virtue of their offices as clerks and may certify their notarial acts only under the seals of their respective courts. Assistant and deputy clerks of superior court, by virtue of their offices, may perform the following notarial acts and may certify these notarial acts only under the seals of their respective courts:

Oaths and affirmations.

Verifications or proofs.Upon completion of the course of study provided for in

G.S. 10B-5(b)

, assistant and deputy clerks of superior court may, by virtue of their offices, perform all other notarial acts and may certify these notarial acts only under the seals of their respective courts. A course of study attended only by assistant and deputy clerks of superior court may be taught at any mutually convenient location agreed to by the Secretary and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Registers of deeds may act as notaries public in their several counties by virtue of their offices as registers of deeds and may certify their notarial acts only under the seals of their respective offices. Assistant and deputy registers of deeds, by virtue of their offices, may perform the following notarial acts and may certify these notarial acts only under the seals of their respective offices:

Oaths and affirmations.

Verifications or proofs.Upon completion of the course of study provided for in

G.S. 10B-5(b)

, assistant and deputy registers of deeds may, by virtue of their offices, perform all other notarial acts and may certify these notarial acts only under the seals of their respective offices. A course of study attended only by assistant and deputy registers of deeds may be taught at any mutually convenient location agreed to by the Secretary and the North Carolina Association of Registers of Deeds.

The Director may act as a notary public by virtue of the Director’s employment in the Department of the Secretary and may certify a notarial act performed in that capacity under the seal of the Secretary.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a person designated a notary public by this section may charge a fee for a notarial act performed in accordance with

G.S. 10B-31

. The fee authorized by this section is payable to the governmental unit or agency by whom the person is employed.

Nothing in this section shall authorize a person to act as a notary public other than in the performance of the official duties of the person’s office unless the person complies fully with the requirements of

G.S. 10B-5

.

History.

1833, c. 7, ss. 1, 2; R.C., c. 75, s. 3; Code, s. 3306; Rev., s. 2349; C.S., s. 3174; 1973, c. 680, s. 1; 1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1998-228, s. 8; 2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-22.
False certificate; foreign language certificates.

A notary shall not execute a notarial certificate containing information known or believed by the notary to be false.

A notary shall not execute a certificate that is not written in the English language. A notary may execute a certificate written in the English language that accompanies a record written in another language, which record may include a translation of the notarial certificate into the other language. In those instances, the notary shall execute only the English language certificate.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-23.
Improper records.

A notary shall not notarize a signature on a record without a notarial certificate indicating what type of notarial act was performed. However, a notary may administer an oath or affirmation without completing a jurat.

A notary shall neither certify, notarize, nor authenticate a photograph. A notary may notarize an affidavit regarding and attached to a photograph.

History.

2005-391, s. 4; 2006-59, s. 13.

§ 10B-24.
Testimonials.

A notary shall not use the official notary title or seal in a manner intended to endorse, promote, denounce, or oppose any product, service, contest, candidate, or other offering. This section does not prohibit a notary public from performing a notarial act upon a record executed by another individual.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-25.
(Expires December 31, 2021 — see note) Emergency video notarization.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a notary may perform an emergency video notarization using video conference technology provided all of the requirements of this section are satisfied. A notary who is not satisfied that the principal’s identity has been proven by satisfactory evidence shall not be required to complete an emergency video notarization. An emergency video notarization shall not change any originality verification requirements for recording with a register of deeds, clerk of superior court, or other government or private office in this State. Nothing in this section shall apply to any notarization under Article 20 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

As used in this section, video conference technology is electronic communication that:

Occurs in real time.

Allows direct interaction between the principal seeking the notary’s services and the notary so that each can communicate simultaneously by sight and sound through an electronic device or process.

Includes audio with sound clear enough that each participant in the notarial act can hear and understand all other participants.

Has sufficient quality to allow a clear and unobstructed visual observation of the face of each participant, and any identification provided by the principal for a sufficient time to allow the notary to determine if it is satisfactory evidence. The notary shall determine if the time is sufficient.

Is not prerecorded video or audio or both.

May be capable of recording by means of one of the following:

The video conference technology’s recording and storage services.

An independent video recording device.

Electronically saved screenshots clearly showing each participant’s face, identification presented by the principal, and the notarized document.

The requirement of personal appearance, appear in person before a notary, physical presence, and presence, as those terms are used in this Chapter, are satisfied for the purpose of an emergency video notarization if the notary is physically present in North Carolina, the principal verifies to the notary that he or she is physically present in North Carolina at the time of the notarization, the principal identifies the county where he or she is located at the time of the notarial act, and the principal and notary use video conference technology that complies with the requirements of this section.

A notary who has personal knowledge of a principal may rely on the video conference technology to verify the principal’s identity unless the notary, in the notary’s sole discretion, requires satisfactory evidence. A notary who does not have personal knowledge of a principal shall require satisfactory evidence of the principal’s identity. The requirement of satisfactory evidence, as that term is used in this Chapter, is satisfied for the purpose of an emergency video notarization if identification of the principal is based on at least one document that meets all of the following:

Is current or, if expired, did not expire prior to March 10, 2020.

Is issued by a federal, state, or federal or state-recognized tribal government agency.

Bears a photographic image of the principal’s face.

Has both the principal’s signature and a physical description of the principal.

The notary shall use video conference technology to observe each principal sign each document that is to be notarized. The principal shall verbally state what documents are being signed for the notarial record. After the document is signed by the principal, the principal or the principal’s designee shall do the following:

If an original wet-signed notarization on an original wet-signed document is not required, transmit a legible copy of the signed document to the notary by fax or other electronic means on the same day it was signed. The notary shall notarize the document on the same day the notary receives the document, and the notary shall transmit the notarized document back to the principal or the principal’s designee by physical delivery, fax, or other electronic means on the same day the notary signed the document.

If an original wet-signed notarization on an original wet-signed document is required, transmit a legible copy of the signed document by fax or other electronic means to the notary on the same day on which the document was signed and also deliver the original signed document to the notary by mail or other physical method. The notary shall compare the original document with the document transmitted by fax or other electronic means. If the faxed or electronic document is the same as the document received by mail or physical delivery, the notary shall notarize the wet signature on the original document and date the notarial act as of the date of the act observed using video conference technology and promptly transmit the original wet-notarized original document to the principal or the principal’s designee by mail or other physical delivery as directed by the principal.

If the notarial act is an oath or affirmation, the notary shall administer the oath or affirmation to the affiant using video conference technology.

An acknowledgement or jurat certificate for an emergency video notarization shall include all of the following:

The North Carolina county in which the notary public was located during the emergency video notarization.

The North Carolina county in which the principal stated he or she was physically located during the emergency video notarization.

The following statement:

I signed this notarial certificate on
_______________
(Date) according to the emergency video notarization requirements contained in

G.S. 10B-25

.

If an acknowledgement or jurat certificate provided to a notary does not include the statement required by subsection (g) of this section, the notary shall insert the statement. By making or giving a notarial certificate using emergency video notarization, whether or not stated in the certificate, a notary certifies compliance with all the requirements of this section.

A notary who performs an emergency video notarization shall record information about the notarization in a notary journal that is the exclusive property of the notary. The journal shall be retained by the notary for at least 10 years and may be maintained in electronic form. The notary shall keep the journal in a secure location and shall not allow another person to make entries in the journal. A notary may surrender the journal to the notary’s employer upon termination of employment, but the notary shall also keep and maintain an accurate copy of the journal.

At a minimum, for each emergency video notarization, the notary shall include the following information in the journal:

The time of day when the notary observed the signing of the document by each principal and was presented with the principal’s acceptable form of identification.

The date of the completion of the emergency video notarization notarial certificate.

The last and first name of each principal.

The type of notarial act performed.

The type of document notarized or proceeding performed.

The type of acceptable form of identification presented including, if applicable, the issuing agency and identification number on the identification presented.

The type of video conference technology used during the emergency video notarization.

A statement that the notary and each principal could see and hear each other.

Whether any other person was present with the principal at the time of signature and if so, the name of that person.

A third party involved in a transaction that utilizes an emergency video notarization may require additional information to be included in the journal kept by the notary under subsection (j) of this section such as inclusion of a recording in the notary’s journal or the method used by the notary to determine that a wet-signed original document is the same as the faxed or electronically submitted document.

As a public official, a notary shall maintain the confidentiality of a principal’s documents at all times.

The Secretary may issue interpretive guidance or issue emergency or temporary rules as necessary to ensure the integrity of the emergency video notarization measures provided for in this section.

This section shall expire at 12:01 A.M. on December 31, 2021; provided, however, all notarial acts made in accordance with this section and while this section is in effect shall remain effective and shall not need to be reaffirmed.

History.

2020-3, s. 4.1(c); 2020-74, s. 27(b); 2020-80, s. 2.9(b); 2021-3, s. 2.10(a).

Expiration of Section.

For expiration of this section, see G.S. 10B-25(n).

§§ 10B-26 through 10B-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.